Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7805
Primary Care Investment Council; duties.

The Primary Care Investment Council shall:

(1) Develop an appropriate definition for primary care investment;

(2) Measure the current level of primary care investment, measured as a part of overall health care spending, by public and private payors in Nebraska;

(3) Conduct a comparison of spending on primary care services and health outcomes in Nebraska with surrounding states and nationally;

(4) Develop an appropriate target level of primary care investment by public and private payors in Nebraska;

(5) Recommend strategies to achieve the target level of primary care investment through alternative payment models;

(6) Identify the public health benefits and estimated cost savings that would result from meeting the target level of primary care investment through alternative payment models; and

(7) Identify solutions to barriers for Nebraska residents from accessing primary care and for health payors and medical providers from investing in primary care.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 15.